District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
33 act may be cited as the “Youth Work Permit and Employment Protection Act of 2025”.
34 Sec. 2. Definitions.
35 For the purposes of this act, the term:
36 (1) “Employ” means to suffer or permit to work for renumeration.
37 (2) “Employable minor” means a minor who is at least 14 years of age.
38 (3) “Employer” means an individual, firm, association, or corporation that
39 employs another individual in the District, except that the term employer shall not include the

40 District government or the federal government.
41 (4) “Infant” means an individual younger than 12 months of age.
42 (5) “Minor” means an individual younger than 18 years of age.
43 (6) “Department” means the Department of Employment Services.
44 (7) “Special occupation” means:
45 (A) Performance on the stage of a licensed theater within the District in a
46 professional theatrical production;
47 (B) Performance in a musical or dance recital or concert;
48 (C) Participation in a radio or television program;
49 (D) Participation in a motion picture, video, or other media production; or
50 (E) Participation in a circus.
51 (8) “In session” means any week when the District of Columbia Public School
52 systems hold regular, non-summer school classes.
53 Sec. 3. Employment of minors.
54 (a) A minor younger than 14 years of age shall not be employed in the District, except in:
55 (1) Irregular or casual work usual to the home of an employer such as babysitting;
56 (2) Work for a business owned solely by the minor’s parent or guardian; provided
57 that such employment shall not be specifically prohibited by a provision of this act or by a
58 regulation promulgated pursuant to this act or by a federal law or regulation.
59 (b) A minor who is 14 or 15 years of age shall not be employed:
60 (1) For more than:
61 (A) 3 hours on a school day, including Fridays;
62 (B) 8 hours on a non-school day; or

63 (C) 18 hours in any one week when school is in session;
64 (D) 40 hours in any one week when school is not in session; and
65 (2) Before 7:00 a.m. or after 7:00 p.m. of any day, provided, that between June 1
66 and Labor Day when school is not in session, a minor 14 or 15 years of age may be employed
67 until 9:00 p.m.
68 (c) A minor who is 16 or 17 years of age shall not be employed:
69 (1) For more than:
70 (A) 6 consecutive days in any one week;
71 (B) 48 hours in any one week; or
72 (C) 8 hours in any one day; and
73 (2) Before 6:00 a.m. or after 11:30 p.m. of any day.
74 (d) An employable minor shall not be employed during school hours, unless the
75 employable minor is engaged in approved work study programming, has been excused from
76 further attendance at school, or is allowed flexible study school hours pursuant to Article II,
77 section I of An Act To provide for compulsory school attendance, for the taking of a school
78 census in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes, approved February 4, 1925 (43 Stat.
79 806; D.C. Official Code § 38-202).
80 (e) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to an employable minor with a valid
81 special occupation permit issued pursuant to section 9.
82 Sec. 4. Notice and recordkeeping.
83 (a)(1) An employer who employs a minor, other than pursuant to section 3(a) shall keep a
84 notice of the requirements of this act, and of any regulation promulgated by the Mayor pursuant
85 to section 13, posted in a conspicuous and accessible place in or about the premises at which the

86 minor is employed.
87 (2) The Department shall provide the notice required pursuant to paragraph (1) of
88 this subsection to an employer upon request, and shall include at minimum the following
89 information:
90 (A) The hours of work for minors as provided in section 3;
91 (B) The occupations prohibited to minors under federal and District law or
92 regulations; and
93 (C) The minimum wages for minors.
94 (b) An employer who employs a minor, other than pursuant to section 3(a) shall keep a
95 list of all minors employed, and an accurate time record showing the hours each minor began and
96 ended work each day, accessible in the place of employment.
97 Sec. 5. Employment dangerous or prejudicial to life prohibited; Mayor to hold public
98 hearing.
99 (a) A minor shall not be employed in a place of employment or in an occupation that the
100 U.S. Secretary of Labor, pursuant to the Fair Labor Standards Act, approved June 25, 1938 (29
101 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), or the mayor pursuant to rulemaking, has determined is dangerous or
102 prejudicial to the life, health, safety, or welfare of minors.
103 (b) An employable minor shall not be employed in operating a freight or nonautomatic
104 elevator, or in a quarry, tunnel, or excavation.
105 (c) An employable minor younger than 16 years of age shall not be employed in any of
106 the following occupations:
107 (1) In the operation of machinery operated by power other than hand or foot
108 power; or

109 (2) In or assisting in oiling, wiping, or cleaning machinery.
110 (d) Subsection (c) of this section shall not apply to a vocational education program or
111 training administered or otherwise approved by the Mayor.
112 (e) The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
113 Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue
114 rules identifying places of employment and occupations deemed dangerous or prejudicial to the
115 life, health, safety, or welfare of minors. In addition to the requirements of the District of
116 Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C.
117 Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), before adopting or repealing a rule authorized pursuant to this
118 subsection, the Mayor shall hold at least one public hearing on the proposed rule or repeal.
119 Sec. 7. Work permit- application.
120 (a) The Department shall develop and maintain an online system through which minors
121 may access a work permit or special occupation permit application that can be signed and
122 submitted to an employer with proof of age.
123 (b) Acceptable proof of a minor’s age includes:
124 (1) A birth certificate, attested transcript issued by a registrar of vital statistics or
125 other officer charged with the duty of recording births, or valid passport;
126 (2) A record of age as given in the records of the school first attended by the
127 minor, if obtainable, or in the earliest available school census;
128 (3) A baptismal record or duly certified transcript thereof showing the date of
129 birth and place of baptism of the minor; or
130 (4) Other documentary evidence determined acceptable by the Department.
131 Sec. 8. Work permit required.

132 (a) Except for minors employer pursuant to section 3(a), no employable minor may be
133 employed unless the employer procures a work permit or special occupation permit pursuant to
134 this act.
135 (b) The work permit or special occupation permit required by this act shall include the
136 following:
137 (1) The minor’s name, date of birth, place of birth, place of residence, grade last
138 completed, the evidence the employer accepted as proof of the minor’s age, and any other details
139 necessary for the identification of the minor;
140 (2) The name and address of the employer for whom the work permit or special
141 occupation permit authorizes the minor to be employed,
142 (3) The nature of the specific occupation in which the minor will be employed;
143 (4) A unique number assigned to the work permit or special occupation permit,
144 and the date of its issue; and
145 (5) The signature of the employer.
146 (c)(1) Each work permit shall be signed by the minor, if the minor is 16 years of age or
147 older. If the minor is under 16 years of age, the permit shall be signed by the minor, age
148 permitting, and the minor’s parent or legal guardian.
149 (2) All special occupation permits issued pursuant to section 9 of this section shall
150 be signed by the minor, age permitting, and the parent or guardian, and agent if applicable, of the
151 minor for whom it is issued.
152 (d)(1) For each minor employed, the employer shall maintain a record containing a copy
153 of the signed permit and a copy of any application materials, including the evidence of age, at the
154 place of employment. Such permit shall be accessible to an inspector or other person authorized

155 to enforce this act.
156 (2) An employer shall submit the appropriate signed permits to the Department
157 within 14 days after the first day of employing a minor.
158 (3) The Department shall maintain a record of all submitted permits and annually,
159 between June 1 and July 1, conduct an audit of all work permits and special occupation permits
160 submitted by employers in the previous year.
161 (e) A work permit or special occupation permit shall only be valid for the employer and
162 specific occupation designated on the permit.
163 Sec. 9. Special occupation permits for minors employed in special occupations.
164 (a) A minor may be employed in a special occupation; provided that the employer
165 procures a special occupation permit, which shall comports with the requirements of this section
166 and section 7 and 8, except as provided in this section.
167 (b) An application for special occupation permit shall be made by the parent or guardian,
168 and by the agent or employer if applicable, of the minor to the Department. The Department shall
169 only issue a special occupation permit if the Department is satisfied that adequate provisions
170 have been made for the educational instruction of the minor, for safeguarding the minor’s health,
171 and for the proper supervision of the minor. The Department may require the employer to
172 provide the necessary resources to satisfy the requirements of this subsection.
173 (c) A minor shall not appear in more than 2 live performances in connection with a
174 special occupation in one day, or more than 8 performances in one week. A minor shall not
175 appear in a live performance or otherwise be required to work in connection with a special
176 occupation before 7:00 a.m. or after 11:30 p.m.
177 (d) A licensed practical nurse with substantial pediatric experience, or a pediatric nurse

178 practitioner, shall be provided for each 3 or fewer infants younger than the age of 30 months.
179 (e) Within any 24-hour period, the time during which a minor 7 years of age or younger
180 is permitted at the place of employment in a special occupation shall be limited as follows:
181 (1) An infant younger than the age of 6 months shall not remain at the place of
182 employment for more than 3 hours, which shall consist of not more than 20 minutes of work.
183 (2) A minor between the ages of 6 months and 30 months shall not remain at the
184 place of employment for more than 4 hours, which shall consist of not more than 2 hours of
185 work, with the balance of the 4-hour period being rest or recreation.
186 (3) A minor between the ages of 30 months and 7 years shall not remain at the
187 place of employment for more than 6 hours, which shall consist of not more than 3 hours of
188 work, with the balance of the 6-hour period being rest, recreation, or education.
189 Sec. 10. Employer to furnish, on demand, proof of age of an employee.
190 (a) Upon reasonable suspicion that an employee is a minor for whom a work permit is not
191 on file, the Department may issue a written notice to the employee’s employer requesting proof
192 of the employee’s age, consistent with section 7(b).
193 (b) The notice shall be served on the employer by personal service to the employer or
194 employer’s representative, or by certified mail.
195 (c) If the employer does not provide proof the employee’s age within 10 days after
196 receiving notice, the employer shall cease employing the employee until the Department receives
197 proof of the employee’s age.
198 Sec. 11. Penalties, enforcement, and prosecutions.
199 (a)(1) The Department shall administer and enforce the provisions of the act, including by
200 conducting sua sponte and complaint-initiated investigations into whether violations have

201 occurred, holding hearings, and instituting actions for penalties.
202 (2)(A) The Department, its inspectors, and other person authorized to enforce this
203 act may visit and inspect, at any time, all places where minors are reasonably believed to be
204 employed, and shall have authority to enter any place or establishment covered by the terms of
205 this act for the purposes of enforcing this act.
206 (B) The Department, its inspectors, and any other person authorized to
207 enforce this act shall have access to any records necessary to enforce this act upon demand;
208 provided, that an employer or individual may not be found to be in violation of this subparagraph
209 unless the employer had an opportunity to challenge the demand before a judge, including an
210 administrative law judge.
211 (b)(1)(A) The Department shall assess an administrative penalty against an employer or
212 individual who:
213 (i) Employs a minor in violation of this act, or of a regulation
214 promulgated pursuant to this act;
215 (ii) Interferes with the Department, its employees, or any other
216 person authorized by the District to inspect places of employment of minors; or
217 (iii) Otherwise violates the provisions of this act.
218 (B) Each day during which a violation of this act occurs or continues to
219 occur shall constitute a separate violation.
220 (2)(A) The administrative penalty assessed pursuant to this subsection shall not
221 exceed $1,000 for each violation of this act; provided, that the Department shall assess an
222 administrative penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each violation of this act that results in the
223 employment of a minor who is injured or dies in the course of that employment.

224 (B) The Department may not collect an administrative penalty under this
225 subsection unless the Department has provided the employer or individual alleged to have
226 violated this act notification of the violation, notification of the amount of the administrative
227 penalty to be imposed, and an opportunity to request a formal hearing held pursuant to the
228 Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code §
229 2-501 et seq.).
230 (c)(1) If a minor is employed in violation of any of the provisions of this act, or of any
231 regulation promulgated by the Mayor pursuant to this act, the Department shall revoke the
232 minor’s work permit or special occupation permit, and shall order the minor’s employer to
233 immediately cease employing the minor.
234 (2) If the minor is younger than 16 years of age, the Department shall notify the
235 minor’s parent, guardian, or custodian.
236 (d) The Attorney General, acting in the public interest, including the need to deter future
237 violations, may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction against an employer or
238 other individual violating this act. Upon prevailing in court, the Attorney General shall be
239 entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, and statutory penalties equal to any
240 administrative penalties provided by law.
241 Sec. 12. Rules.
242 The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
243 approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall issue rules
244 to implement the provisions of this act.
245 Sec. 13. An Act to regulate the employment of minors within the District of Columbia,
246 Approved May 29, 1928 (45 Stat. 998; D.C. Official Code § 32-201 et seq.), is repealed.

247 Sec. 14. Fiscal impact statement.
248 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
249 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
250 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
251 Sec. 15. Effective date.
252 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
253 Mayor. Action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
254 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
255 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).